Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NORTHSIDE BOXING CLUB.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Northside Boxing Club to provide business and life skills to youth through mentorships and training in the craft of barbering. Northside Boxing shall utilize hand-picked barbers to act as positive role models for youth, instilling Northside Boxing's core values of discipline, respect, and hard work. Programming for youth participants shall include development of essential and transferable skills such as customer service, communication, money management, and professionalism. Northside Boxing may use funds to provide wraparound services, including but not limited to meals, nutrition education, homework help, and tutoring to help facilitate participants being able to start and stay in the program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end